Maryland, session 2026, HB1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
ARTICLE XVI–A – THE INITIATIVE
1.
THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE, RESERVING TO THEMSELVES THE POWER KNOWN
AS THE INITIATIVE, MAY BY PETITION SUBMIT TO THE REGISTERED VOTERS OF THE
STATE FOR THEIR APPROVAL OR REJECTION AT THE POLLS ANY PROPOSED BILL TO
ADD TO, REPEAL, OR AMEND THE PUBLIC GENERAL LAWS OR THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION THAT WAS NOT APPROVED AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL SESSION OF
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
2.
(A) BEFORE A PETITION OR ANY PART OF A PETITION IS CIRCULATED
AMONG THE VOTERS OF THE STATE:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1403*

HOUSE BILL 1403
(1) THE TEXT OF THE PROPOSAL CONTAINED IN THE PETITION SHALL
BE SUBMITTED TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE; AND
(2) IF A SUMMARY OF THE PROPOSAL IS INCLUDED IN THE PETITION,
THE SUMMARY SHALL BE APPROVED FOR ACCURACY BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) (1) AN INITIATIVE PETITION MAY CONSIST OF SEVERAL PAPERS.
(2) EACH PAPER OF THE PETITION SHALL CONTAIN THE FULL TEXT
OF THE PROPOSAL.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PETITION
TO SUBMIT TO THE VOTERS OF THE STATE A PROPOSAL CONCERNING THE PUBLIC
GENERAL LAWS SHALL BE SIGNED BY REGISTERED VOTERS OF THE STATE IN A
NUMBER EQUAL TO AT LEAST 10% OF THE VOTES CAST IN THE LAST ELECTION FOR
GOVERNOR.
(2) NOT MORE THAN 50% OF THE SIGNERS OF A PETITION MAY BE
REGISTERED VOTERS IN BALTIMORE CITY OR ANY SINGLE COUNTY.
(D) (1) AN INITIATIVE PETITION SHALL BE FILED WITH THE SECRETARY
OF STATE WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE FINAL ACTION ON THE BILL BY
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) ATTACHED TO EACH PAPER OF SIGNATURES FILED WITH A
PETITION, THERE SHALL BE AN AFFIDAVIT OF THE PERSON PROCURING THOSE
SIGNATURES THAT STATES THAT BASED ON THE PERSON’S BEST KNOWLEDGE AND
BELIEF:
(I) EVERY SIGNATURE ON THE PAPER IS GENUINE; AND
(II) THE SIGNERS ARE REGISTERED VOTERS IN THE STATE AND
IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION INDICATED ON THE PAPER.
(3) IF THE SECRETARY OF STATE DETERMINES THAT THE ORIGINAL
AND ANY SUPPLEMENTAL PETITIONS BEAR THE REQUISITE NUMBER OF VALID
SIGNATURES, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL CERTIFY THE PROPOSAL FOR A
VOTE.
(E) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL PRESCRIBE BY LAW THE FORM OF THE
PETITION FOR AN INITIATIVE PROPOSAL, THE MANNER FOR VERIFYING THE

HOUSE BILL 1403 3
AUTHENTICITY OF PETITIONS, AND OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES THAT
ARE NECESSARY AND NOT IN CONFLICT WITH THIS ARTICLE.
3.
(A) (1) AN INITIATIVE PROPOSAL CERTIFIED BY THE SECRETARY OF
STATE AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION SHALL BE
SUBMITTED TO THE VOTERS AT THAT ELECTION.
(2) A PROPOSAL CERTIFIED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE LESS
THAN 90 DAYS BEFORE A GENERAL ELECTION SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE VOTERS
AT THE NEXT SUCCEEDING GENERAL ELECTION.
(B) BEFORE THE ELECTION AT WHICH THE INITIATIVE PROPOSAL IS TO BE
VOTED ON, THE TEXT OF THE PROPOSAL SHALL BE PUBLISHED IN A MANNER
PROVIDED BY LAW.
(C) ON THE BALLOT USED IN THE ELECTION AT WHICH THE INITIATIVE
PROPOSAL IS VOTED ON, EACH INITIATIVE PROPOSAL SHALL:
(1) APPEAR AS A SEPARATE ITEM IN A FORMAT PRESCRIBED BY THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT SUFFICIENTLY IDENTIFIES THE PROPOSAL; AND
(2) BE FOLLOWED BY THE WORDS “FOR THE INITIATIVE PROPOSAL”
AND “AGAINST THE INITIATIVE PROPOSAL”.
(D) (1) THE VOTES CAST FOR AND AGAINST EACH INITIATIVE PROPOSAL
SHALL BE RETURNED TO THE GOVERNOR WITHIN 30 DAYS.
(2) THE GOVERNOR SHALL MAKE A DETERMINATION OF THE
NUMBER OF VOTES CAST FOR AND AGAINST THE PROPOSAL.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL IMMEDIATELY BY PROCLAMATION DECLARE THE PROPOSAL
TO BE EFFECTIVE IF:
(I) IN THE CASE OF PUBLIC GENERAL LAW, AT LEAST 50% OF
THE VOTES CAST ON THE PROPOSAL HAVE BEEN CAST IN FAVOR OF IT; OR
(II) IN THE CASE OF A CHANGE TO THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION, AT LEAST TWO–THIRDS OF THE VOTES CAST ON THE PROPOSAL
HAVE BEEN CAST IN FAVOR OF IT.

HOUSE BILL 1403
(4) IF TWO OR MORE INITIATIVE PROPOSALS RECEIVE A FAVORABLE
MAJORITY AND THE GOVERNOR, WITH THE ADVICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL,
DETERMINES THAT THESE PROPOSALS ARE IN IRRECONCILABLE CONFLICT, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL DECLARE ONLY THE PROPOSAL RECEIVING THE HIGHEST
NUMBER OF VOTES TO BE PART OF THE PUBLIC GENERAL LAWS OR THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION.
(5) A PROPOSAL DECLARED TO BE PART OF THE PUBLIC GENERAL
LAWS OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT 30 DAYS AFTER THE
ISSUANCE OF THE GOVERNOR’S PROCLAMATION.
4.
AN INITIATIVE PROPOSAL THAT BECOMES PART OF THE PUBLIC GENERAL
LAWS OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION MAY BE AMENDED OR REPEALED IN THE 2
YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING ITS EFFECTIVE DATE ONLY IF THE CHANGE IS
APPROVED BY A TWO–THIRDS VOTE OF BOTH HOUSES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection pursuant to Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general election,
the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each
ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and “Against
the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the election,
all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.